pl: Funkcje poprawiające widoczność liny ratunkowej: Świecące w ciemności; Jaskrawy kolor; Brak; Odblaskowa nić; Reagujące na promieniowanie UV; Inne
ja: スローロープの視認性機能: 蓄光; 視認性の高い色; なし; 反射材トレーサー; UV反応; その他
ru: Особенности видимости спасательного линя: Светящаяся в темноте; Яркий (сигнальный) цвет; Нет; Светоотражающая нить; Светящаяся в УФ-лучах; Другое
pt-PT: Características de visibilidade da corda de lançamento: Brilha no escuro; Cor de alta visibilidade; Nenhuma; Fio refletor; Reativo a UV; Outro
sl-SI: Vidljivost vrvi za metanje: Sveti v temi; Zelo vidna barva; Brez; Odsevna nit; Reaktivno na UV-svetlobo; Drugo
ro-RO: Caracteristici de vizibilitate pentru parâma de salvare: Fosforescent; Culoare cu vizibilitate ridicată; Niciuna; Fir reflectorizant integrat; Reactiv la UV; Altele
hr-HR: Značajke vidljivosti užeta za bacanje: Svijetli u mraku; Boja visoke vidljivosti; Ništa; Reflektirajuća nit; Reagira na UV zračenje; Ostalo
nb: Synlighetsfunksjoner for kastetau: Selvlysende; Høysynlighetsfarge; Ingen; Reflekterende tråd; UV-reaktiv; Annet
sk-SK: Viditeľnosť vrhacieho lana: Svietiace v tme; Vysoko viditeľná farba; Žiadne; Reflexné vlákno; UV reaktívne; Iné
lt-LT: Metamosios virvės matomumo ypatybės: Švytintis tamsoje; Gerai matoma spalva; Nėra; Šviesą atspindintis siūlas; Reaguojantis į UV spindulius; Kita
de: Sichtbarkeitsmerkmale des Wurfseils: Nachleuchtend; Gut sichtbare Farbe; Keine; Reflektierender Faden; UV-reaktiv; Sonstige
hu: Mentőkötél láthatósági jellemzői: Sötétben világító; Jól láthatósági szín; Nincs; Fényvisszaverő szál; UV-reaktív; Egyéb
fi: Heittoköyden näkyvyysominaisuudet: Pimeässä hohtava; Huomioväri; Ei mitään; Heijastava nauha; UV-reaktiivinen; Muu
nl: Werplijn zichtbaarheidskenmerken: Glow-in-the-dark; Opvallende kleur; Geen; Reflecterende tracer; Uv-reactief; Overige
it: Caratteristiche di visibilità della cima da lancio: Fosforescente; Colore ad alta visibilità; Nessuna; Filo riflettente; Reattiva ai raggi UV; Altro
tr: Atma ipi görünürlük özellikleri: Karanlıkta parlayan; Yüksek görünürlüğe sahip renk; Yok; Reflektörlü iz; UV reaktif; Diğer
sv: Synlighetsfunktioner för kastrepet: Självlysande; Varningsfärg; Inga; Reflexinslag; UV-reaktiv; Annat
bg-BG: Функции за видимост на спасителното въже: Светещо в тъмното; Цвят с висока видимост; Няма; Светлоотразителна нишка; UV реактивно; Друго
zh-TW: 拋繩能見度功能: 夜光; 高能見度顏色; 無; 反光標示線; UV 反應; 其他
cs: Viditelnost házecího lana: Svítící ve tmě; Vysoce viditelná barva; Žádné; Reflexní proužek; Reagující na UV záření; Ostatní
zh-CN: 抛绳可视性设计: 夜光; 高可见度颜色; 无; 反光示踪线; 紫外线反应; 其他
th: คุณสมบัติการมองเห็นของเชือกโยน: เรืองแสงในที่มืด; สีสะท้อนแสง; ไม่มี; แถบสะท้อนแสง; ทำปฏิกิริยากับ UV; อื่นๆ
da: Synlighedsfunktioner for kasteline: Selvlysende; Meget synlig farve; Ingen; Reflekterende tråd; UV-reaktiv; Andet
fr: Caractéristiques de visibilité de la corde de sauvetage: Phosphorescente; Couleur haute visibilité; Aucune; Traceur réfléchissant; Réactive aux UV; Autre
el: Χαρακτηριστικά ορατότητας σχοινιού ρίψης: Φωσφορίζει στο σκοτάδι; Χρώμα υψηλής ορατότητας; Κανένα; Ανακλαστικό νήμα; Αντιδρά στην υπεριώδη ακτινοβολία (UV); Άλλο
es: Características de visibilidad de la cuerda de lanzamiento: Brilla en la oscuridad; Color de alta visibilidad; Ninguna; Trazador reflectante; Reactiva a los rayos UV; Otro
vi: các tính năng dễ nhìn thấy của dây ném: Dạ quang; Màu dễ thấy; Không có; Dây phản quang; Phản ứng tia UV; Khác
en: Throw rope visibility features: Glow-in-the-dark; High-visibility color; None; Reflective tracer; UV-reactive; Other
pt-BR: Corda de arremesso recursos de visibilidade: Brilha no escuro; Cor de alta visibilidade; Nenhum; Marcador reflexivo; Reativo a UV; Outros
ko: 투척용 로프 가시성 기능: 야광; 고시인성 색상; 없음; 반사 트레이서; UV 반응형; 기타